Louisiana, session 2026, HB832.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2481.8 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2481.8. Chief of police; city of Baton Rouge; evaluation
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the chief of
police of the city of Baton Rouge shall be evaluated three years from the date of his
initial appointment by the mayor-president of the city of Baton Rouge, parish of East
Baton Rouge. Thereafter, the chief of police shall be evaluated every year by the
mayor-president. After each evaluation by the mayor-president, the mayor-president
may reconfirm the chief of police for another one-year period or may, at his
discretion, demote the chief of police to his former class of position. The demotion
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1122 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 832
shall not constitute corrective or disciplinary action, and the classified employee
shall not have appeal rights in regards to such action.